District of Columbia statutes.
8-1304

Hazardous waste management plan.

Within 6 months of the effective date of this chapter, the Mayor shall publish in the District of Columbia Register a hazardous waste management plan for the District of Columbia, which shall include, as a minimum:

(1)

A description of the criteria for determining what constitutes a hazardous waste;

(2)

Identification of the types and quantities of hazardous wastes generated in the District of Columbia, of hazardous wastes which may be amenable for recycling or reuse, of current hazardous waste management practices, of proper procedures for the handling, storage and transportation of hazardous wastes and of the best methods and facilities or sites (including possible extrajurisdictional sites) for the storage, treatment or disposal of hazardous wastes; and

(3)

A comparison of the alternatives, costs and benefits of public and private transportation, storage, treatment, and disposal of hazardous wastes.

History

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-64, § 5, 24 DCR 6289

Section References

This section is referenced in § 8-1305.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-704.
1973 Ed., § 6-524.